Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-516
Associated member.

(a) Only a member of a series limited liability company may be an associated member of a protected series of the company.

(b) A member of a series limited liability company becomes an associated member of a protected series of the company if the operating agreement or a procedure established by the agreement states:

(1) that the member is an associated member of the protected series;

(2) the date on which the member became an associated member; and

(3) any protected-series transferable interest the associated member has in connection with becoming or being an associated member.

(c) If a person that is an associated member of a protected series of a series limited liability company is dissociated from the company, the person ceases to be an associated member of the protected series.

Laws 2018, LB1121, § 17.